Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB469.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1 and 2 of the act of August 5, 1977 (P.L.181, No.47), entitled "An act providing for the acceptance by the Governor of jurisdiction relinquished by the United States to the Commonwealth over lands within the Commonwealth's boundaries," are amended to read:Section 1. General provisions.The consent of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania is hereby given to the retrocession of jurisdiction by the United States over land within the boundaries of the Commonwealth now owned or later acquired by the United States. The Governor is hereby 12345678910111213141516171819 authorized to accept for the Commonwealth such retrocession to partial, concurrent, or exclusive jurisdiction.Section 2. Procedure.Retrocession of jurisdiction shall be effected upon the completion of the following procedure:(1) Written notice shall be filed with the Governor by the United States, or any department or agency thereof, in accordance with applicable acts of Congress. When a notice is filed by the principal officer of the military installation or other authorized representative of the United States having supervision and control over the land of a military installation, the notice shall:(i) Clearly state the subject matter for the concurrent jurisdiction request, specifically identifying whether it includes juvenile delinquency and status offenses.(ii) Provide a metes and bounds description of the boundary of the concurrent jurisdiction request.(iii) Indicate whether the request includes future contiguous expansions of land acquired for military purposes.(2) The Governor shall give public notice of retrocession of jurisdiction by publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) Written acceptance shall not be made less than 30 days after public notice of retrocession.(4) The following procedure shall apply when a notice is filed:(i) When the notice is filed by the principal officer of the military installation or other authorized 20250HB0469PN0452 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 representative of the United States having supervision and control over the land of a military installation, the Governor's written acceptance shall confirm each of the elements of the request that are accepted and shall cause to be filed with the Secretary of the Commonwealth:(A) The United States' request for concurrent jurisdiction.(B) The Governor's written acceptance.(C) The metes and bounds description of the land to be recorded and indexed.(ii) Upon the filing with the Secretary of the Commonwealth , the Governor shall cause a certified copy of the recorded documents to be sent to the requestor.(5) Upon the establishment of concurrent jurisdiction, any State or local agency may enter into a reciprocal agreement or memorandum of understanding with any agency of the United States for coordination and designation of responsibilities related to the concurrent jurisdiction.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0469PN0452 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819